Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.180

Threat to public health—Order prohibiting sale or disposition of food or other items pending investigation.

Pending the results of an investigation provided for under RCW 43.70.170, the secretary may issue an order prohibiting the disposition or sale of any food or other item involved in the investigation. The order of the secretary shall not be effective for more than fifteen days without the commencement of a legal action as provided for under RCW 43.70.190.

[ 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 257; 1979 c 141 s 54; 1967 ex.s. c 102 s 4. Formerly RCW 43.20A.645 and 43.20.160.]

NOTES:

Severability—1967 ex.s. c 102: See note following RCW 43.70.130.